Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 2. Banking Practices.

Sec. 06.05.090.
Certification of checks.

The check of a depositor may not be certified unless the amount of the check actually stands to the credit of the drawer.

Any check certified is a valid obligation against the bank when held by an innocent holder.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

History.

(§ 3.101 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 384-387.

Sec. 06.05.095.
Payment of items.

If the balance in an account subject to withdrawal by or upon the order of a depositor is insufficient to pay an item presented for payment, a bank may select from the items that in the aggregate exceed the balance the items to be paid in the order convenient to the bank.

History.

(§ 3.102 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 7 ch 85 SLA 1988)

Sec. 06.05.100.
Deposit of minor or person under disability.

Where a deposit is made in a bank by or on behalf of a minor or a person under disability in the name of the minor or person under disability, the bank may pay the money on check or order of that person as in other cases.

History.

(§ 3.103 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 14 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Secs. 06.05.105,
06.05.110.
Deposits in two names; deposits in trust. [Repealed, § 5 ch 78 SLA 1972. For current law, see AS 13.33.]

Sec. 06.05.120.
Notice of charges.

A bank or other financial institution that levies a charge for the establishment or maintenance of personal nonbusiness demand deposit accounts shall clearly post a schedule of the charges in each of its places of business where these accounts are opened.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1976; am § 15 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

06.05.463

. Renumbered in 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

Bank’s liability to customer for imposing allegedly excessive service charges. 73 ALR4th 1028.

Sec. 06.05.130.
Final adjustment of statements of account. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.145.
Adverse claim to bank deposit.

Notice to a bank of an adverse claim to a deposit standing on its books to the credit of a person is ineffective unless the adverse claimant procures a restraining order, injunction or other appropriate process against the bank from a court in a cause where the person to whose credit the deposit stands is made a party or executes to the bank in form and with sureties acceptable to it a bond, indemnifying the bank from any liability, loss, damage, costs and expenses on account of the payment of the adverse claim or the dishonor of the check or other order of the person to whose credit the deposit stands on the books of the bank. This section does not apply where the person to whose credit the deposit stands is a fiduciary for the adverse claimant, and the facts constituting that relationship and the facts showing a reasonable belief on the part of the claimant that the fiduciary is about to misappropriate the deposit are made to appear by the affidavit of the claimant.

History.

(§ 3.112 ch 129 SLA 1951)

Sec. 06.05.160.
Transmitting money and foreign exchange.

A bank may accept for transmission and transmit money, and may buy and sell foreign exchange to the extent necessary to meet the reasonably anticipated needs of customers.

History.

(§ 3.115 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 16 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.165.
Optional five-day week. [Repealed, § 1 ch 56 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 06.05.166.
Legal holidays and closings.

A bank organized under or doing business under the laws of the state or a national bank may remain closed on the legal holidays described in AS

44.12.010

—

44.12.025

. The bank shall post a notice of holiday closing in the place of business affected at least seven days in advance.

If a contract by its terms requires the payment of money or the performance of a condition on a holiday allowed under (a) of this section by or at a state or national bank, payment may be made or the condition performed on the next succeeding business day with the same effect as if made or performed in accordance with the terms of the contract.

In an emergency, a bank may elect not to open any of its banking offices on a business or banking day or, having opened, to close any banking office. The bank shall notify the department of the nonopening or the closing before taking the action, if possible, and as soon as possible, in any event. Any act relating to the banking office that has been closed for any period of time under this subsection may be performed on the next business day that the office is open for business. No liability or loss of rights of any kind on the part of any person, firm, or corporation or of the bank results from the nonopening or closing, and the rights of all parties are suspended during the nonopening or closing.

In addition to legal holidays, a bank’s board of directors may declare a closing of the bank on any other normal business day, if the department authorizes the closure, the bank posts notice of the closing in the place of business affected at least 15 days in advance, and the bank maintains all normal processing and clearing operations on the closed day.

Under (a) or (d) of this section, a bank may not be closed for more than three consecutive days.

A bank may operate a branch bank on a different schedule approved by the department if the department determines that operation on a different schedule will provide better service or otherwise benefit the public.

History.

(§ 2 ch 56 SLA 1971; am § 7 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 17 — 19 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.175.
Depositor and customer records confidential. [Repealed, § 55 ch 75 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 06.05.180.
Fiduciary and other powers authorized.

Every bank organized under this chapter, subject to the restrictions and limitations of laws and the regulations of the department, may

act as trustee under any mortgage or bond issued by the state, or any municipality, body politic, or corporation, foreign or domestic, and accept and execute any municipal or corporate trust not prohibited by the laws of this state;

accept a trust from, and execute a trust for, a married person in respect to the married person’s separate property, and act as agent in the management of the property or transact any business in relation to the property;

act under the order or appointment of a court of competent jurisdiction, including any probate court, as custodian, receiver, or trustee of the estate of a minor, and as depository of money paid into court for the benefit of any person, corporation, or party, and in any other fiduciary capacity;

act under the order or appointment of a court of competent jurisdiction, including any probate court, as trustee, custodian, receiver or committee of the estate of an incapacitated person, as defined in AS

13.26.005

, or of a spendthrift, or as receiver or committee of the property or estate of a person in insolvency or bankruptcy proceedings;

act as executor or administrator with or without the will annexed of the estate of a deceased person;

accept and execute any legal trust, duty, and power in regard to the holding, management, and disposition of any estate, real or personal, wherever located, and the rents and profits from it, or the sale of it, as may be granted or confided to it by a court of competent jurisdiction, including any probate court, or by any person, corporation, municipality, or other authority, and is accountable to all parties in interest for the faithful discharge of every trust, duty, or power which it may accept;

accept and execute any trust or power conferred upon it by any person or any body politic or domestic or foreign corporation, or any other authority, grant, assignment, transfer, devise, bequest, or otherwise, or which may be entrusted or committed or transferred to it by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, including any probate court;

receive, manage, hold, and dispose of according to the terms of any trust or power any property or estate, real or personal, which may be the subject of any such trust or power;

act as the fiscal or transfer agent of the United States or of any state, territory, municipality, or other body politic, and in this capacity may receive and disburse money, transfer, register, and countersign certificates of stocks, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness;

whenever the instrument or power governing the fiduciary relationship directs, requires, authorizes, or permits investment in obligations of the United States government, or its agencies or instrumentalities, invest in those obligations either directly or in the form of securities of, or other interests in, an open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 — 80a-64 (Investment Company Act of 1940) if

the portfolio of the investment company or investment trust is limited to

obligations of the United States government, or its agencies or instrumentalities;

repurchase agreements fully collateralized by the obligations identified in (i) of this subparagraph; and

securities of, or other interests in, other open-end or closed-end management type investment companies or investment trusts registered under 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 — 80a-64 whose portfolios are limited to the obligations and repurchase agreements identified in (i) and (ii) of this subparagraph; and

the investment company or investment trust takes delivery of the collateral for any repurchase agreement directly or through an authorized custodian.

History.

(§ 3.140 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1988; am § 8 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1996)

Legislative history reports. —

For an analysis of the amendment of this section by sec. 8, ch. 85, SLA 1988 (HCS CSSB 413 (Jud)), see 1988 House & Senate Joint Journal Supplement No. 18, May 10, 1988, pp. 2 and 3.

Collateral references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d, Banks, § 1 et seq.

76 Am. Jur. 2d, Trusts, § 1 et seq.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 248-250.

Secs. 06.05.185 — 06.05.195.
Application of chapter to trust companies; supervision by the department; dissolution of trust companies. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.197.
Nominees.

A state or national bank or a trust company, when acting in the state as a fiduciary or as a co-fiduciary with others, may with the consent of its co-fiduciary or co-fiduciaries, if any, who are hereby authorized to give such consent, cause any investment it holds as a fiduciary or co-fiduciary to be registered and held in the name of a nominee or nominees of the bank or trust company. The bank or trust company is liable for the acts of its nominee with respect to an investment registered in the nominee’s name.

The records of the bank or trust company must at all times show the ownership of the investment registered and held in the name of its nominee. The bank or trust company shall retain possession and control of the investment and keep the investment separate and apart from its assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 25 SLA 1964)